Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1.
do enact as follows:AB1,1Section 1. 115.385 (1) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 115.385 (1) (b) 1m., and 115.385 (1) (b) 1m. (intro.), as renumbered, is amended to read:115.385 (1) (b) 1m. (intro.) An Subject to subd. 2m., an index system to identify a school’s level of performance and a school district’s level of improvement and to annually assign to each school and school district one of the following performance categories:AB1,2Section 2. 115.385 (1) (b) 2m. of the statutes is created to read:115.385 (1) (b) 2m. For the school and school district accountability reports published for the school year beginning on the July 1 immediately preceding the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], and for each school year thereafter, the department shall use the same cut scores and the same score ranges for the performance categories under subd. 1m. that the department used for the report published under this section in the 2019-20 school year.AB1,3Section 3. 115.385 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:115.385 (1) (c) A qualitative definition for For each of the 5 performance categories in par. (b) 1m., the same qualitative definition that the department used for the report published under this section in the 2019-20 school year.AB1,4Section 4. 118.30 (1j) of the statutes is created to read:118.30 (1j) For examinations administered under this section or 20 USC 6311 (b) (2) in the school year beginning on the July 1 immediately preceding the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], and in each school year thereafter, the department shall do all of the following:(a) For examinations in English language arts and mathematics administered to pupils in grades 3 to 8, use cut scores, score ranges, and pupil performance categories that are aligned to the cut scores, score ranges, and pupil performance categories set by the National Assessment of Educational Progress for the same subject and the same grade.(b) For examinations in English, reading, and mathematics administered to pupils in grades 9 to 11, use the same cut scores, the same score ranges, and the same pupil performance categories that the department used to evaluate the same examinations administered in the 2021-22 school year, including the following terminology for the pupil performance categories:1. Below Basic.2. Basic.3. Proficient.4. Advanced. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab1 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB1 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB1: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting